Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.05.020

Intent.

Chapter 1, Laws of 2017 declares that the people of Washington state support amending the Constitution of the United States to eliminate the undue influence of concentrated money and political power on elections and governmental policy. The amendment would overturn decisions by the supreme court of the United States extending constitutional rights to corporations and other artificial legal entities as well as those decisions equating the spending of money with free speech. It also provides for the regulation and disclosure of political contributions and spending.

[ 2017 c 1 s 1 (Initiative Measure No. 735, approved November 8, 2016).]